Colorado, session 2026A, SB086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.5-101, add
(9.5) as follows:
39-28.5-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 28.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(9.5) "PREMIUM CIGAR" MEANS A CIGAR THAT IS ROLLED BY HAND,
HAS A WRAPPER MADE OF WHOLE TOBACCO LEAVES, AND DOES NOT HAVE
A FILTER OR A MOUTHPIECE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.5-102, amend
(1) introductory portion; and add (6) as follows:
39-28.5-102. Tax levied.
(1) Except as set forth in subsection (3) SUBSECTIONS (3) AND (6)
of this section, there is levied a tax upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state, excluding
modified risk tobacco products, at the rate of:
(6) THE TAX IMPOSED UPON THE SALE, USE, CONSUMPTION,
HANDLING, OR DISTRIBUTION OF PREMIUM CIGARS PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IS TWENTY PERCENT OF THE
MANUFACTURER'S LIST PRICE OF THE PREMIUM CIGARS.
SECTION 3. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
July 1, 2026, and applies to the sale, use, consumption, handling, or
distribution of premium cigars on or after said date.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
-2- SB26-086

determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- SB26-086